Hawaii, session 2026, HB1926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that numerous fuel spills have occurred over the decades at the Red Hill Bulk Fuel Storage Facility, including the most recent occurrence on November 20, 2021.  One of the results of the November 2021 fuel spill was the birth of the Red Hill Water Alliance Initiative (WAI), a working group that met regularly in 2023 and posed questions, conducted research, listened to subject-matter experts, and formulated recommended policies regarding how to address the various, complex environmental and public-health hazards caused by the various releases of fuel. After much diligent work, the Red Hill WAI issued a public report in November 2023 that set forth its findings and recommendations.  Some of the recommendations can only be addressed by the federal government, while other recommendations can be undertaken by the State and city and county of Honolulu.  The legislature further finds that there is an urgent and crucial need for further research on how to accelerate the degradation of fuel in the environment to prevent the fuel from reaching potable-water sources and for a better understanding of the unique hydrology of Red Hill through groundwater modeling. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of land and natural resources for these purposes. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $11,169,513 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the Red Hill remediation special fund established pursuant to section 174E-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the Red Hill remediation special fund established pursuant to section 174E-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the sum of $11,169,513 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be allocated in the following manner: (1)  $2,800,193 for studies on remediation of substances released from the Red Hill Bulk Fuel Storage Facility; (2)  $4,379,320 for environmental monitoring and testing; (3)  $750,000 for research on groundwater modeling and sampling; and (4)  $3,240,000 for independent testing and verification of water data, to be published on a public dashboard. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  The department of land and natural resources shall seek reimbursement from the United States Department of Defense for all of the costs identified in section 3 of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________